Missouri, session 2026, HB1834.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 566.151, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 566.151, to read as follows:
566.151. 1. A person twenty-one years of age or older commits the offense of
enticement of a child if he or she persuades, solicits, coaxes, entices, or lures whether by
words, actions or through communication via the internet or any electronic communication,
any person who is less than [seventeen] eighteen years of age for the purpose of engaging in
sexual conduct.
2. It is not a defense to a prosecution for a violation of this section that the other
person was a peace officer masquerading as a minor.
3. Enticement of a child or an attempt to commit enticement of a child is a felony for
which the authorized term of imprisonment shall be not less than five years and not more than
thirty years. No person convicted under this section shall be eligible for parole, probation,
conditional release, or suspended imposition or execution of sentence for a period of five
calendar years.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.